California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
An Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty shall not be imposed with respect to an applicable household member for a month if the last day of the month occurred during a period in which the applicable household member did not maintain minimum essential coverage for a continuous period of three months or less.

(a) The length of a continuous period shall be determined without regard to the calendar years in which months in that period
 occur.

(b) If a continuous period is greater than the period allowed under this subdivision, an exception shall not be provided under this subdivision for any month in the period.

(c) If there is more than one continuous period described in this subdivision covering months in a calendar year, the exception provided by this subdivision shall only apply to months in the first of those periods.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules for the collection of the penalty imposed by this section in cases where continuous periods include months in more than one taxable year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 42.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

61025.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board’s civil authority and procedures for purposes of compliance with notice and other due process requirements imposed by law to collect income taxes shall be applicable to the collection of the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty.

(b) The Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty shall be paid upon notice and demand by the Franchise Tax Board, and shall be assessed and collected pursuant
 to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), except as follows:

(1) If an applicable individual fails to timely pay the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty, the applicable individual shall not be subject to a criminal prosecution or penalty with respect to that failure.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall not file a notice of lien with respect to any real property of an applicable individual by reason of any failure to pay the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty, or levy any real property with respect to that failure.

(3) For the purpose of collecting the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty, Article 1 (commencing with Section 19201) of Chapter 5 of Part 10.2 shall not apply.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall integrate enforcement of the
 Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty into existing activities, protocols, and procedures, including audits, enforcement actions, and taxpayer education efforts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 42.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

61030.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may, in consultation with the Exchange, adopt regulations that are necessary and appropriate to implement this part.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in construing this part, the regulations promulgated by under Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code as of December 15, 2017, notwithstanding the specified date in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17024.5, shall apply to the extent that those regulations do not conflict with this part or regulations promulgated by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to subdivision (a) in consultation with the Exchange.

(c) Until January 1, 2022, the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section
 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation, standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 8, Sec. 19.   (AB 85)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

61035.

Beginning July 1, 2023, and on July 1 annually thereafter, moneys collected from the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty shall be deposited into the Health Care Affordability Reserve Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 61.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

61040.

The provisions of this part are severable. If any provision of this part or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 42.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

61045.

The Franchise Tax Board shall annually publish on its internet website all of the following information:

(a) The number of applicable households paying the penalty and the average penalty amount by applicable household income level.

(b) The number of applicable households paying the penalty in each county and statewide.

(c) The total penalty amount collected.

(d) The number and type of most commonly claimed exemptions.

(e) The number and total penalty amounts collected under subdivision (j) of Section 61005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 42.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

61050.

(a) On or before March 1, 2022, and annually on or before March 1 thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall report to the Legislature on information regarding this part and Title 24 (commencing with Section 100700) and Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code, including all of the following:

(1) The total number of applicable households paying the penalty and the total number of dependents for
 whom applicable households pay the penalty, by county and by adjusted gross income class.

(2) The total penalty amounts imposed, by county and by adjusted gross income class.

(3) The total statewide penalty amount imposed.

(4) The total number of exemptions applied, and the most common qualifications for exemptions applied.

(5) The number of applicable households who pay the penalty and the number of dependents claimed by applicable households who pay the penalty, by federal poverty level category. The federal poverty level shall be estimated using adjusted gross income and number of individuals in the tax household, using the following categories:

(A) At or between 0 percent and 138
 percent of the federal poverty level.

(B) At or between 139 percent and 266 percent of the federal poverty level.

(C) At or between 267 percent and 400 percent of the federal poverty level.

(D) At or above 401 percent of the federal poverty level.

(6) The number and amount of state financial subsidies paid and adjustments made through reconciliation, by county and by federal poverty level category as described in paragraph (5).

(b) The report shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 801, Sec. 1.   (AB 414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

